Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1246XS (4) 91 th/ns S.F. 230 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.83 Towing vehicles. 1 1. A person shall not tow or impound a motor vehicle 2 without the ownerâs consent, unless the person does all of the 3 following: 4 a. Posts signs in a manner to provide notice that an 5 unauthorized vehicle parked on private property, as described 6 on the sign, will be towed and the location where a towed 7 vehicle will be impounded. 8 b. Documents the towing, including by taking and keeping 9 photographs of the vehicle prior to initiating the tow, after 10 the vehicle is secured for towing, and after the vehicle is 11 parked following the tow. 12 c. Maintains accurate records of the vehicle towed, 13 including all of the following: 14 (1) The vehicleâs make, model, and registration plate 15 number. 16 (2) The date and time of the tow. 17 (3) The location from which the vehicle was towed. 18 (4) The contact information for the person who authorized 19 the tow. 20 2. A person who initiates a tow shall cease all towing 21 actions if the vehicle owner arrives at the location of the 22 ownerâs vehicle before the tow is completed, and shall release 23 the vehicle to the owner if the owner pays a fee. A person who 24 initiates and then ceases towing a vehicle shall not charge 25 a fee in excess of fifty percent of the amount that would be 26 charged for a consensual tow. 27 3. A person who has towed or impounded a motor vehicle 28 without the ownerâs consent shall do all of the following: 29 a. Notify the vehicle owner, including a lienholder if 30 applicable, and the local law enforcement agency within 31 twenty-four hours. The notice must include the vehicleâs 32 description, the location where the vehicle is stored, contact 33 information for the person who towed the vehicle, and the 34 amount of fees that will be charged. 35 -1- LSB 1246XS (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 8 S.F. 230 b. Display all towing rates at the personâs place of 1 business and on the personâs internet site, if applicable. 2 c. Provide an itemized account detailing all fees associated 3 with a tow. 4 d. Allow the owner of the vehicle to recover the vehicle at 5 a reasonable time and during at least a ten-hour period on a 6 day other than a Saturday or Sunday. 7 e. Allow the owner of the vehicle to access personal 8 property from within the vehicle without reclaiming the 9 vehicle. 10 f. Accept payment by credit card, in addition to other forms 11 of payment. 12 g. Reimburse the vehicle owner for any damage to the vehicle 13 caused by the person who towed the vehicle. 14 4. A person shall not tow a motor vehicle unless the person 15 is responding to a request to tow a vehicle. 16 5. A fee charged by a person who towed or impounded a motor 17 vehicle shall not exceed the amount the person charges for a 18 consensual tow or the reasonable storage costs, as applicable. 19 6. A person who tows a motor vehicle shall reimburse the 20 vehicle owner for all costs associated with the tow if the 21 person does not comply with this section. In addition to the 22 reimbursement and any criminal penalty, if applicable, the 23 person shall also pay the vehicle owner an amount not less than 24 four times the sum of the towing and storage fees. 25 7. This section does not apply to abandoned vehicles which 26 may be taken into custody as provided in section 321.89 or 27 disposed of as provided in section 321.90. 28 Sec. 2. Section 321.89, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 2. Authority to take possession of abandoned vehicles. A 31 police authority, upon the authorityâs own initiative or 32 upon the request of any other authority having the duties of 33 control of highways or traffic, shall take into custody an 34 abandoned vehicle on public property and may take into custody 35 -2- LSB 1246XS (4) 91 th/ns 2/ 8 S.F. 230 an abandoned vehicle on private property. The police authority 1 may employ its own personnel, equipment, and facilities or 2 hire a private entity, equipment, and facilities for the 3 purpose of removing, preserving, storing, or disposing of 4 abandoned vehicles. A property owner or other person in 5 control of private property may employ a private entity who 6 is a garagekeeper, as defined in section 321.90 , to dispose 7 of an abandoned vehicle, and the private entity may take into 8 custody the abandoned vehicle without a police authorityâs 9 initiative. If a police authority employs a private entity 10 to dispose of abandoned vehicles, the police authority shall 11 provide the private entity with the names and addresses of the 12 registered owners, all lienholders of record, and any other 13 known claimant to the vehicle or the personal property found in 14 the vehicle. The owners, lienholders, or other claimants of 15 the abandoned vehicle shall not have a cause of action against 16 a private entity for action taken under this section if the 17 private entity provides notice , allows inspection, and provides 18 information about the vehicle as required by subsection 3 , 19 paragraphs âaâ through âfâ . 20 Sec. 3. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraphs a, e, and 21 f, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 22 a. A police authority or private entity that takes into 23 custody an abandoned vehicle shall send notice by certified 24 mail that the vehicle has been taken into custody no more than 25 twenty five days after taking custody of the vehicle. Notice 26 shall be sent to the last known address of record of the last 27 known registered owner of the vehicle, all lienholders of 28 record, and any other known claimant to the vehicle. 29 e. If the persons receiving notice do not ask for a hearing 30 or exercise their right to reclaim the vehicle or personal 31 property within the ten-day twenty-day reclaiming period, the 32 owner, lienholders, or claimants shall no longer have any 33 right, title, claim, or interest in or to the vehicle or the 34 personal property. If proper notice and an opportunity to 35 -3- LSB 1246XS (4) 91 th/ns 3/ 8 S.F. 230 inspect the vehicle is not provided to the owners, lienholders, 1 and known claimants, there shall be no forfeiture of the 2 personâs right, title, claim, or interest in or to the vehicle 3 and personal property, as applicable. 4 f. A court in any case in law or equity shall not recognize 5 any right, title, claim, or interest of the owner, lienholders, 6 or claimants after the expiration of the ten-day twenty-day 7 reclaiming period if proper notice is provided to the owners, 8 lienholders, and known claimants as required in this subsection 9 and such persons were provided timely opportunity to inspect 10 the vehicle and retrieve personal property, as applicable . 11 Sec. 4. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph b, 12 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 (3) Information for the persons receiving the notice of 14 their right to inspect and reclaim the vehicle and personal 15 property contained therein within ten twenty days after the 16 effective date of the notice. Persons may reclaim the vehicle 17 or personal property upon payment of all reasonable towing, 18 preservation, and storage charges resulting from placing the 19 vehicle in custody and upon payment of the costs of notice 20 required pursuant to this subsection . Persons may reclaim any 21 personal property from a vehicle during the normal business 22 hours of the entity with custody of the vehicle at no cost and 23 without reclaiming the vehicle. 24 Sec. 5. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 25 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 26 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) An itemized account of all fees to be 27 assessed when the vehicle is reclaimed. 28 Sec. 6. Section 321.89, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 29 by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. A person who receives notice under 31 this subsection may request to inspect the vehicle or personal 32 property contained therein, or receive specific information 33 as to the condition of the vehicle or personal property, and 34 if requested, the entity with custody of the vehicle shall 35 -4- LSB 1246XS (4) 91 th/ns 4/ 8 S.F. 230 provide the requested information or an opportunity to inspect 1 the vehicle, as applicable, prior to the expiration of the 2 twenty-day reclamation period. If the entity with custody of 3 the vehicle fails to timely provide the requested information 4 or an opportunity to inspect the vehicle and personal property 5 therein, the entity shall not sell or dispose of the vehicle or 6 personal property until the requested information is provided 7 or the inspection occurs, at which point the period to reclaim 8 the vehicle is extended for five additional days after the 9 information is provided or the inspection takes place. 10 Sec. 7. Section 321.89, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 4. Reclamation of abandoned vehicles and personal 13 property . An entity with custody of an abandoned vehicle shall 14 provide an itemized account of all fees assessed when the 15 vehicle is reclaimed. Prior to driving an abandoned vehicle 16 away from the premises, a person who received , or who is 17 reclaiming the vehicle on behalf of a person who received , 18 notice under subsection 3 shall present to the police authority 19 or private entity, as applicable, the personâs valid driverâs 20 license and proof of financial liability coverage as provided 21 in section 321.20B . During the normal business hours of the 22 entity with custody of the vehicle, a person may retrieve the 23 personâs personal property left in the vehicle at no cost and 24 without reclaiming the vehicle. 25 Sec. 8. Section 321.89, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. If an abandoned vehicle is sold and the 28 entity that took the vehicle into custody failed to provide 29 the required notice and opportunity to inspect and reclaim the 30 vehicle and personal property, as applicable, the entity who 31 sold the vehicle shall pay a lienholder, if applicable, the 32 amount remaining on the vehicle loan. 33 Sec. 9. Section 321.90, subsection 2, paragraph f, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -5- LSB 1246XS (4) 91 th/ns 5/ 8 S.F. 230 f. The owner of an abandoned motor vehicle and all 1 lienholders shall no longer have any right, title, claim, or 2 interest in or to the motor vehicle; and no court in any case 3 in law or equity shall recognize any right, title, claim, or 4 interest of any owner or lienholders after the disposal of the 5 motor vehicle to a demolisher , so long as proper notice and an 6 opportunity to inspect the vehicle and personal property in 7 accordance with section 321.89, subsection 3, was provided . 8